Tennessee, session 114, SB0982.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-55-104(b), is amended by
deleting the first sentence and substituting:
Warrantor registration records must be filed annually and must be updated by the
warrantor within thirty (30) days of any change, subject to subsection (d).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-55-104, is amended by adding
the following new subsection (d) and redesignating the existing subsections accordingly:
(d) A warrantor applying for renewal is not required to file a copy of a warranty
that has already been registered for use. A warrantor must provide written notification of
any change to the information contained in the original registration within thirty (30) days
of the change. Such notification does not require the submission of a new registration
application.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect on July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to renewals and notifications submitted after that date.
SB0982
002428
- 1 -